District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.06

Examinations.

(a)

An applicant who otherwise qualifies for a license, registration, or certification is entitled to be examined as provided by this chapter.

(b)

(1)

Each board that administers examinations shall give examinations to applicants at least twice a year at times and places to be determined by the Board.

(2)

When the Mayor, pursuant to subsection (e)(2) of this section, determines that a national examination is acceptable, then the frequency, time, and place that the national examination is given shall be considered acceptable and in accordance with this chapter.

(c)

Each board shall notify each qualified applicant of the time and place of examination.

(d)

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, each board shall determine the subjects, scope, form, and passing score for examinations to assess the ability of the applicant to practice effectively the health occupation regulated by the board.

(e)

Each board, in its discretion, may waive the examination requirements:

(1)

For any applicant who meets the requirements of § 3-1205.07 for licensure, registration, or certification by reciprocity or endorsement; or

(2)

For any person who has been certified by a national examining board if the Mayor determines by rule that the examination was as effective for the testing of professional competence as that required in the District.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 506, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(l), 42 DCR 457
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(e)(6), 56 DCR 4043
This section is referenced in § 3-1205.03 and § 3-1205.09a.
1981 Ed., § 2-3305.6.
D.C. Law 18-26, in subsec. (a), substituted “license, registration, or certification” for “license”; and, in subsec. (e)(1), substituted “licensure, registration, or certification” for “licensure”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e)(6) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).